Massachusetts, session 194th, S3106.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 249 the following section:-
Section 250. (a) As used in this section, the following terms shall have the following
meanings unless the context requires otherwise:-
“DEHP”, Di(2-ethylhexyl)phthalate.
“Intentionally added DEHP”, DEHP that a manufacturer has intentionally added to an
intravenous solution container or intravenous tubing product; provided, however, that such
DEHP has a functional or technical effect on the product.
“Intravenous solution container”, a container used to hold medicine, fluid or nutrition
therapy that is intravenously delivered to a patient in a hospital, outpatient facility or other health
care facility; provided, however, that an intravenous solution container shall not include: (i)
of 3

human blood collection or storage bags; or (ii) apheresis and cell therapy blood kits and bags,
including integral tubing, as contained in Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.
“Intravenous tubing product”, tubing for intravenously administering fluids, medication
or nutrients directly to an adult, child or infant.
“Ortho-phthalate”, a class of chemicals that are esters of ortho-phthalic acid, including
DEHP and: (i) butyl benzyl phthalate; (ii) dibutyl phthalate; (iii) dicyclohexyl phthalate; (iv)
diethyl phthalate; (v) diisobutyl phthalate; (vi) diisodecyl phthalate; (vii) diisononyl phthalate ;
(viii) di-n-hexyl phthalate; (ix) di-n-octyl phthalate; (x) di-n-pentyl phthalate; or (xi) diisoheptyl
phthalate.
(b) A person or entity shall not manufacture, sell or contribute into commerce in the
commonwealth intravenous solution containers made with intentionally added DEHP; provided,
however, that an intravenous solution container may have trace amounts of DEHP if such DEHP
is not used for a function or technical effect and is not more than 0.1 percent weight per weight.
A person or entity may not replace DEHP with another ortho-phthalate in a new or revised
intravenous solution container.
(c) A person or entity shall not manufacture, sell or contribute into commerce in the
commonwealth intravenous tubing product made with intentionally added DEHP; provided,
however, that an intravenous tubing product may have trace amounts of DEHP if it is not used
for a functional or technical effect and is not more than 0.1 per cent weight per weight. A person
or entity may not replace DEHP with another ortho-phthalate in a new or revised intravenous
tubing product.
SECTION 2. Subsection (b) of section 1 shall take effect on January 1, 2030.
of 3

SECTION 3. Subsection (c) of section 1 shall take effect on January 1, 2035.
of 3